Illinois, session 104th, HB2531.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grocery Initiative Act is amended by 5changing Sections 5 and 15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 750/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Cooperative" means an organization that is organized 9according to the Co-operative Act. 10    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity.12    "Food desert" means a census tract that:13        (1) meets one of the following poverty standards:14            (A) the census tract has a poverty rate of at least 15        20%; or16            (B) the census tract is not located within a 17        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 18        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the 19        statewide median household income; or20            (C) the census tract is located within a 21        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 22        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the greater 23        of (i) the statewide median household income or (ii)   HB2531- 2 -LRB104 09581 HLH 19644 b1        the metropolitan area median family income; and2        (2) meets one of the following population density and 3    food accessibility standards:4            (A) the census tract is a rural tract, and at least 5        33% of the population of the tract or at least 500 6        residents in the tract reside more than 10 miles from 7        the nearest grocery store; or8            (B) the census tract is an urban tract, and at 9        least 33% of the population of the tract or at least 10        500 residents in the tract reside more than one-half 11        mile from the nearest grocery store.12    The Department may also designate an area that does not 13meet the standards set forth in this definition as a food 14desert if the designation is made in accordance with criteria 15established by the Department by rule using data that 16includes, but is not limited to, poverty metrics and access to 17existing grocery stores.18    "Grocery store" means an existing or planned retail 19establishment that: (1) has or will have a primary business of 20selling a variety of grocery products, including fresh 21produce; (2) derives or will derive no more than 30% of its 22revenue from sales of tobacco and alcohol in any given year; 23(3) is or will be classified as (i) a supermarket or other 24grocery retailer in the 2022 North American Industry 25Classification System under code 445110, (ii) a meat retailer 26in the 2022 North American Industry Classification System   HB2531- 3 -LRB104 09581 HLH 19644 b1under code 44524, (iii) a fruit and vegetable retailer in the 22022 North American Industry Classification System under code 344523, or (iv) a fish and seafood retailer in the 2022 North 4American Industry Classification System under code 44525; (4) 5accepts or will accept Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 6Program benefits and Special Supplemental Nutrition Program 7for Women, Infants, and Children benefits; and (5) provides or 8will provide for the retail sale of a substantial variety of 9perishable foods, including fresh or frozen dairy products, 10fresh produce, and fresh meats, poultry, and fish. 11    "Local governmental unit" means any county, municipality, 12township, special district, or unit that is designated as a 13unit of local government by law and exercises limited 14governmental powers or powers in respect to limited 15governmental subjects. "Local governmental unit" also includes 16any school district or community college district.17    "Not-for-profit corporation" means an organization or 18institution that is organized and conducted on a 19not-for-profit basis with no personal profit inuring to anyone 20as a result of the operation and that is organized according to 21the General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 1986.22    "Rural tract" means a census tract that is not an urban 23tract.24    "Urban tract" means a census tract having its geographic 25centroid in an urban area, as defined by the Bureau of the 26Census for the most recent year in which all relevant data to   HB2531- 4 -LRB104 09581 HLH 19644 b1identify food deserts is available.2(Source: P.A. 103-561, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (20 ILCS 750/15)4    Sec. 15. Grocery Initiative Grants and Financial Support.5    (a) The Department shall, subject to appropriation, 6establish the Grocery Initiative to expand access to healthy 7foods in food deserts in Illinois and areas at risk of becoming 8food deserts in Illinois by providing grants and other forms 9of financial assistance to independently owned for-profit 10grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, or not-for-profit 11grocery stores, as well as grocery stores owned and operated 12by local governmental units. The Department may enter into 13contracts, grants, or other agreements to administer these 14grants and other forms of financial assistance. The Department 15may, by rule, place limits on the size of the grocery stores 16that are eligible for grants and other financial assistance 17under this Act, including, but not limited to, limits on the 18annual revenue or projected revenue of the applicant, number 19of full-time employees, or square footage of the facilities. 20The Department may prioritize grant awards and loan funding to 21applicants based on poverty rates, income, geographic 22diversity, local ownership, access to grocery stores in the 23area surrounding proposed project locations, and other factors 24as determined by the Department. The Department may award 25grants or provide loans for any one or more of the following:  HB2531- 5 -LRB104 09581 HLH 19644 b1        (1) market and site feasibility studies, promotional 2    materials, and marketing;3        (2) salaries and benefits for workers;4        (3) rent or a down payment to acquire a facility;5        (4) purchase of ownership of a grocery store as part 6    of establishing a new grocery store;7        (5) capital improvements, planning, renovations, land 8    acquisition, demolition, durable and non-durable equipment 9    purchases; or10        (6) other costs as determined eligible by the 11    Department.12    (b) The Department may, subject to appropriation, provide 13grants for equipment upgrades for existing independently owned 14for-profit grocery stores, cooperative grocery stores, 15not-for-profit grocery stores, or farmer-owned grocery stores 16or markets. The Department shall use no more than 20% of total 17program funding for this purpose. Equipment upgrades shall be 18focused on providing access to equipment that is energy 19efficient and to provide access to equipment that is needed to 20accept payment from the Women, Infant, Children's program 21(WIC).22(Source: P.A. 103-561, eff. 1-1-24; 103-957, eff. 1-1-25.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242025.